Massachusetts, session 194th, H2314.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 35:57A the following section:
SECTION 35:58.
(a) There shall be established and set upon the books of the commonwealth a separate
fund to be known as the Dukes County Sheriff Regional Lockup Fund to be administered by the
Dukes County Sheriff’s Office.
(b) The purpose of the Fund shall be to provide the only state-funded regional lockup
service to the towns in Dukes County to which facility persons arrested with or without a
warrant, taken into protective custody, held on contempt or by court order, or arrested under any
civil process may be detained. Police officers shall have the full authority and jurisdiction of a
police officer anywhere in the County while transporting an incarcerated or detained person to a
regional lockup facility as well as during transport through any city, town, or county, including
of 2

to and at a hospital or medical or psychiatric facility or office, or to, at or on a ferry or aircraft if
appropriate, and throughout the arrest, delivery and booking process. A municipal police
department that is a member of the Dukes County Regional Lockup Facility System does not
have to comply with section 36C of chapter 40. A town may become a member of the Dukes
County Regional Lockup Facility System by executing a written agreement with the Sheriff of
Dukes County. The regional lockup facility superintendent, appointed by the sheriff of Dukes
County, and deputy sheriffs of Dukes County where the regional lockup facility is located, shall
have the same authority, jurisdiction, and duty as a police officer to detain, book, hold, and
transport a pre-arraignment incarcerated person or any other detained or incarcerated person to or
from the regional lockup facility.
(c) There shall be credited to the Fund all amounts that are, by law, transferred or
authorized to be transferred thereto or directed to be deposited therein, and all amounts received
as gifts, grants or contributions for the purposes of the Fund. Amounts credited to the Fund shall
not be subject to further appropriation and any money remaining in the Fund at the end of a fiscal
year shall not revert to the General Fund.
of 2